Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.6 Clean Water Infrastructure

46-15.6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be referred to as the “Comprehensive Clean Water Infrastructure Act of 1993”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1.

46-15.6-2.
Legislative findings, intent, and objectives.

The general assembly hereby recognizes and declares that:

Water is vital to life and comprises an invaluable natural resource which is not to be abused by any segment of the state’s population or its economy. It is the policy of this state to restore, enhance, and maintain the chemical, physical, and biological integrity of its waters to protect health.

The waters of this state are a critical renewable resource which must be protected to insure the availability of safe and potable drinking water for present and future needs.

It is a paramount policy of the state to protect the purity of present and future drinking water supplies by protecting the infrastructure of potable water, including treatment plants, pipes, valves, pumping stations, storage facilities, interconnections, and water mains.

It is imperative to provide a uniform and valid mechanism to base assistance for the construction, repair, protection, and/or improvement of potable water infrastructure replacement.

The decay of infrastructure and related construction due to deterioration or functional obsolescence can threaten the quality of supplies and, therefore, can endanger public health; thus it is necessary to take immediate and continuing steps to repair and replace the infrastructure used to deliver water supplies in order to restore water system facilities.

Failure to replace the infrastructure used to deliver water supplies may cause and probably will continue to degrade the quality of public drinking water.

Protection of water quality is necessary from the collection source through the point of delivery to the ultimate consumer.

The potable threat to public health caused by unsafe drinking water far outweighs the economic costs for the construction of the potable water infrastructure replacement.

That the objectives of this chapter are:

To establish a funding mechanism to insure that infrastructure replacement programs are carried out by each municipality and by each municipal department, agency, district, authority, or other entity engaged in or authorized to engage in the supply, treatment, transmission, or distribution of drinking water, and

That the plans and their execution achieve and insure that the investment of the public in such facilities is not eroded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 53.

46-15.6-3.
Infrastructure replacement program.

All municipalities, municipal departments and agencies, districts, authorities or other entities engaged in or authorized to engage in the supply, transmission, distribution of drinking water on a wholesale or retail basis, and which obtain, transport, purchase, or sell more than fifty million (50,000,000) gallons of water per year, shall be referred to as “water suppliers” for the purpose of this chapter. All water suppliers shall prepare, maintain, and carry out an infrastructure replacement program as described in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1.

46-15.6-4.
Content of infrastructure replacement component.

The infrastructure replacement component (hereinafter referred to as “component”) shall include without limitation:

A detailed financial forecast of facility replacement improvement requirements for the next twenty (20) years including, but not limited to, the principal components of the water system such as reservoirs, dams, treatment plants, pipes, valves, fire hydrants, pumping stations, storage facilities, pumping and well equipment, interconnections and water mains. Each financial forecast shall analyze the condition and life expectancy of the existing facilities, prioritize needed repairs and replacements and amortize such improvement requirements on an annual basis over the next twenty (20) years in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated herein. Water suppliers which have in effect infrastructure improvement or rehabilitation programs and mechanisms for funding approved by their appropriate governing bodies may submit their existing programs for complete or partial compliance with the provisions of this section.

A method that establishes and maintains fiscal controls and accounting depreciation standards sufficient to ensure proper accounting for evaluation of facility requirements necessitated by this chapter in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated herein.

Components shall be consistent with applicable local comprehensive plans in which the service areas are or are planned to be located.

Proceeds from the watershed protection fund shall be usable for reimbursement of water suppliers for preparation of their infrastructure replacement components as described in this chapter up to fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the component.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1.

46-15.6-5.
Completion, filing, approval and implementation of infrastructure component.

Each water supplier required by this chapter to prepare and maintain an infrastructure replacement component shall complete and adopt a component two (2) years subsequent to the date each party’s water supply management plan per §

46-15.3-7.5

is due.

Water suppliers subject to the requirements of §

46-15.6-3

shall file a copy of all components, only to the extent the components differ from plans filed under §

46-15.3-5.1

thereto with the following: the division of drinking water quality of the department of health (hereinafter referred to as “the department”).

A water supplier subject to §

46-15.6-3

shall review their components at least once every five (5) years and shall modify or replace their components as necessary.

The department shall coordinate expeditious review of components prepared by water suppliers subject to this chapter. Upon receipt of components prepared by water suppliers under this chapter, water resources board, and the division of public utilities and carriers (for those water suppliers within their jurisdiction) shall have one hundred and twenty (120) days to review the components and submit comments thereon to the department. Upon consideration of written comments by all agencies designated herein the department shall determine whether the component complies with the requirements of this chapter. This determination shall be made within eight (8) months of the initial submission. A thirty (30) day public comment period shall be included in this eight (8) month review period. Failure by the department to notify water suppliers of its determination within the prescribed time limit shall constitute approval.

Each water supplier shall implement the requirements of its infrastructure replacement program and component, including its infrastructure replacement fund, as mandated by this chapter in accordance to rules and regulations promulgated per §

46-15.6-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 9; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 9.

46-15.6-6.
Financing infrastructure replacement.

The cost of infrastructure replacement programs and indemnification as required by this chapter shall be financed as follows:

The cost of programs to implement infrastructure replacement shall be paid by the water users. The charges shall be limited to those necessary and reasonable to undertake the actions required by this chapter. These charges shall be based upon the annual funding requirements of the facility improvements necessitated over each successive twenty (20) year period. Interest earned on money in this infrastructure replacement fund shall be credited to this infrastructure replacement fund.

Each water supplier designated in §

46-15.6-3

shall establish a special account designated as the infrastructure replacement fund to be held as a restricted receipt account and to be administered by the water supplier solely to implement and carry out the replacement of infrastructure as required by this chapter.

Any money which may accumulate in the infrastructure replacement fund in excess of that needed to implement the annual infrastructure replacement program or in excess of that exclusively pledged to repayment of outstanding bonds or notes or loan repayments to implement the infrastructure replacement program shall revert to the rate payers of that particular system on a biannual basis.

Each water supplier designated in §

46-15.6-3

may, as a complete or partial alternative to direct funding of its infrastructure replacement program, finance its infrastructure replacement program through bonding. The annual debt service of each bond or bonds shall be applied and credited towards the annual requirement of the infrastructure replacement program’s annual funding requirements.

The Rhode Island public utilities commission, as to water suppliers within its jurisdiction, shall permit an increase for just and reasonable infrastructure replacement in the portion of the water suppliers’ rate structure to comply with this chapter and shall allow the water supplier to add this required funding to its rate base in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 9; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 9.

46-15.6-7.
Rules governing content of programs, components, review, evaluation, funding, and implementation.

The department with the concurrence of the water resource board, and the Rhode Island public utilities commission, as to water suppliers within its jurisdiction, shall forthwith promulgate rules and regulations for the review of components as pertains to financial forecasts of facility replacement, improvement requirements and fiscal controls and accounting depreciation standards per §

46-15.6-4(a)(1)

and (a)(2). The department with the concurrence of the water resource board, and the Rhode Island public utilities commission, as to water suppliers within its jurisdiction, shall promulgate the criteria or standards which it will use to evaluate the implementation of approved components, programs and funding mechanisms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 9; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 9.

46-15.6-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation or determination made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person, agency or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule, regulation, or determination and the application of such provisions to other persons, agencies, or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1.

46-15.6-9.
Excluding requirement of state mandated cost.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

shall not apply to §§

46-15.6-1

—

46-15.6-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 438, § 1.